Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1192.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 9.94A.737 and 2020 c 82 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:(1) If an offender is accused of violating any condition or requirement of community custody, the department shall address the violation behavior. The department may hold offender disciplinary proceedings not subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The department shall notify the offender in writing of the violation process.(2)(a) The offender's violation behavior shall determine the sanction the department imposes. The department shall adopt rules creating a structured violation process that includes presumptive sanctions, aggravating and mitigating factors, and definitions for low level violations and high level violations.(b) After an offender has committed and been sanctioned for five low level violations, subsequent violations committed by that offender may be considered high level violations, provided that any decision to elevate a violation complies with policies and rules established by the department.(c)(i) The department must define aggravating factors that indicate the offender may present a current and ongoing foreseeable risk and which therefore elevate an offender's behavior to a high level violation process.(ii) The state and its officers, agents, and employees may not be held criminally or civilly liable for a decision to elevate or not to elevate an offender's behavior to a high level violation process under this subsection unless the state or its officers, agents, and employees acted with reckless disregard.(3) The department may intervene when an offender commits a low level violation by sanctioning the offender to one or more nonconfinement sanctions or to not more than three days in total confinement.(a) The department shall develop rules to ensure that each offender subject to a short-term confinement sanction is provided the opportunity to respond to the alleged violation prior to imposition of total confinement.(b) The offender may appeal the short-term confinement sanction to a panel of three reviewing officers designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The offender's appeal must be in writing and hand-delivered to department staff, or postmarked, within seven days after the sanction is imposed.(4) If an offender is accused of committing a high level violation, the department may sanction the offender to not more than thirty days in total confinement per hearing.(a) The offender is entitled to a hearing prior to the imposition of sanctions; and(b) The offender may be held in total confinement pending a sanction hearing. Prehearing time served must be credited to the offender's sanction time.(5) If the offender's underlying offense is one of the following felonies provided in this subsection and the violation behavior constitutes a new misdemeanor, gross misdemeanor, or felony, the offender shall be held in total confinement pending a sanction hearing, and until the earlier of: The date the sanction expires; the date a prosecuting attorney files new charges against the offender; or the date a prosecuting attorney provides the department with written notice that new charges will not be filed for the violation behavior. The following underlying offenses apply to the restrictions in this subsection:(a) Assault in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.36.011;(b) Assault of a child in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.36.120;(c) Assault of a child in the second degree, as defined in RCW 9A.36.130;(d) Burglary in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.52.020;(e) Child molestation in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.44.083;(f) Commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.100;(g) Dealing in depictions of a minor engaged in sexually explicit conduct, as defined in RCW 9.68A.050;(h) Homicide by abuse, as defined in RCW 9A.32.055;(i) Indecent liberties with forcible compulsion, as defined in RCW 9A.44.100(1)(a);(j) Indecent liberties with a person capable of consent, as defined in RCW 9A.44.100(1)(b);(k) Kidnapping in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.40.020;(l) Murder in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.32.030;(m) Murder in the second degree, as defined in RCW 9A.32.050;(n) Promoting commercial sexual abuse of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.101;(o) Rape in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.44.040;(p) Rape in the second degree, as defined in RCW 9A.44.050;(q) Rape of a child in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.44.073;(r) Rape of a child in the second degree, as defined in RCW 9A.44.076;(s) Robbery in the first degree, as defined in RCW 9A.56.200;(t) Sexual exploitation of a minor, as defined in RCW 9.68A.040; or(u) Vehicular homicide while under the influence of intoxicating liquor or any drug, as defined in RCW 46.61.520(1)(a).(6) The department shall adopt rules creating hearing procedures for high level violations. The hearings are offender disciplinary proceedings and are not subject to chapter 34.05 RCW. The procedures shall include the following:(a) The department shall provide the offender with written notice of the alleged violation and the evidence supporting it. The notice must include a statement of the rights specified in this subsection, and the offender's right to file a personal restraint petition under court rules after the final decision;(b) Unless the offender waives the right to a hearing, the department shall hold a hearing, and shall record it electronically. For offenders not in total confinement, the department shall hold a hearing within fifteen business days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after written notice of the alleged violation. For offenders in total confinement, the department shall hold a hearing within five business days, but not less than twenty-four hours, after written notice of the alleged violation;(c) The offender shall have the right to: (i) Be present at the hearing; (ii) have the assistance of a person qualified to assist the offender in the hearing, appointed by the hearing officer if the offender has a language or communications barrier; (iii) testify or remain silent; (iv) call witnesses and present documentary evidence; (v) question witnesses who appear and testify; and (vi) receive a written summary of the reasons for the hearing officer's decision; and(d) The sanction shall take effect if affirmed by the hearing officer. The offender may appeal the sanction to a panel of three reviewing officers designated by the secretary or by the secretary's designee. The offender's appeal must be in writing and hand-delivered to department staff, or postmarked, within seven days after the sanction was imposed. The appeals panel shall affirm, reverse, modify, vacate, or remand based on its findings. If a majority of the panel finds that the sanction was not reasonably related to any of the following: (i) The crime of conviction; (ii) the violation committed; (iii) the offender's risk of reoffending; or (iv) the safety of the community, then the panel will reverse, vacate, remand, or modify the sanction.(7) For purposes of this section, the hearings officer may not rely on unconfirmed or unconfirmable allegations to find that the offender violated a condition. Any alleged violations of the conditions of community custody must be proven by a preponderance of the evidence.(8) Hearing officers shall report through a chain of command separate from that of community corrections officers.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 72.09 RCW to read as follows:(1) In any hearing for an alleged violation of the disciplinary rules of total confinement, the alleged violation must be proven by a preponderance of the evidence. If the hearing officer finds the incarcerated individual not guilty of a violation, disciplinary sanctions shall not be imposed on the incarcerated individual for that violation.(2) In any hearing for an alleged violation of the disciplinary rules or required conditions of partial confinement, the alleged violation must be proven by a preponderance of the evidence. If the hearing officer determines that the allegation has not been proven by a preponderance of the evidence at the hearing, the partial confinement status of the individual must continue.(3) The department shall adopt rules necessary to implement this section.Sec. 3. RCW 72.09.130 and 1995 1st sp.s. c 19 s 6 are each amended to read as follows:(1) The department shall adopt, by rule, a system that clearly links an inmate's behavior and participation in available education and work programs with the receipt or denial of earned early release days and other privileges. The system shall include increases or decreases in the degree of liberty granted the inmate within the programs operated by the department, access to or withholding of privileges available within correctional institutions, and recommended increases or decreases in the number of earned early release days that an inmate can earn for good conduct and good performance.(2) Earned early release days shall be recommended by the department as a reward for accomplishment. The system shall be fair, measurable, and understandable to offenders, staff, and the public. At least once in each twelve-month period, the department shall inform the offender in writing as to his or her conduct and performance. This written evaluation shall include reasons for awarding or not awarding recommended earned early release days for good conduct and good performance. An inmate is not eligible to receive earned early release days during any time in which he or she refuses to participate in an available education or work program into which he or she has been placed under RCW 72.09.460.(3) The department shall provide each offender in its custody a written description of the system created under this section. The system created under this section must conform to section 2 of this act.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2026.--- END ---